Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201414-2109
Utilities district; personnel; duties; salary.

The board of directors of a metropolitan utilities district shall at
its first regular meeting appoint an individual with an official title designated
by the board who shall (1) act as secretary of such board, (2) have general
supervision of the management, construction, operation, and maintenance of
the utility plants and property under the jurisdiction of or owned by such
metropolitan utilities district, subject to the direction of the board, (3)
hold office at the pleasure of the board, (4) possess business training, executive
experience, and knowledge of the development and operation of public utilities,
(5) receive
such compensation as the board may determine, and
(6) devote his or her exclusive time to the duties of the office.
The board of directors may employ or authorize the employment of such other
employees and assistants as may be deemed necessary for the operation and
maintenance of the utility plants under its jurisdiction and of the conduct
of the affairs of the board and provide for their compensation. The compensation
of the appointed individual and such employees shall be paid from funds under
control of the board. In no event shall the compensation, as a salary or otherwise,
of any employee or officer exceed ten thousand dollars per annum unless approved
by a vote of two-thirds or more of the members of the board of directors.
The record of such vote of approval, together with the names of the directors
so voting, shall be made a part of the permanent records of the board.

Laws 1913, c. 143, § 13, p. 356;

R.S.1913, § 4255;

Laws 1919, c. 33, § 2, p. 108;

C.S.1922, § 3758;

Laws 1923, c. 134, § 1, p. 329;

C.S.1929, § 14-1014;

R.S.1943, § 14-1020;

Laws 1947, c. 20, § 3, p. 108;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 14-1020;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1101.01;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 177, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB207, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB208, § 1.